Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.30, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Tax credit establishment. (a) A qualifying taxpayer may claim a tax credit against the tax due under chapter 290 equal to $1.50 for each gallon of sustainable aviation fuel that is: (1) produced in Minnesota or blended with aviation or gasoline or jet fuel in Minnesota; and (2) sold in Minnesota to a purchaser who certifies that the sustainable aviation fuel is for use as fuel in an aircraft departing from an airport in Minnesota. (b) new text begin A qualifying taxpayer must apply to the commissioner for the certification and allocation of a tax credit in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end The credit deleted text begin may be claimed only after approval and certification by the commissioner anddeleted text end is limited to the amount stated on the credit certificate issued under subdivision 3deleted text begin . A qualifying taxpayer must apply to the commissioner for certification and allocation of a credit in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.deleted text end new text begin and may be claimed only after:new text end new text begin (1) approval and certification by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) the Environmental Quality Board completes a generic environmental impact statement on sustainable aviation fuel. new text end (c) A qualifying taxpayer may claim a credit for blending or producing sustainable aviation fuel, but not both. If sustainable aviation fuel is blended with aviation gasoline or jet fuel, the credit is allowed only for the portion of sustainable aviation fuel that is included in the blended fuel. (d) If the amount of credit that the taxpayer is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the liability for tax under chapter 290, the commissioner of revenue must refund the excess to the taxpayer. Sec. 2. new text begin TEMPORARY MORATORIUM ON DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE GRANTS TO SUSTAINABLE AVIATION FUEL PRODUCERS AND BLENDERS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of agriculture must not award any grant to a producer or blender of sustainable aviation fuel before the Environmental Quality Board completes a generic environmental impact statement on sustainable aviation fuel. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin GENERIC ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT STATEMENT ON SUSTAINABLE AVIATION FUEL.new text end new text begin The Environmental Quality Board must order a generic environmental impact statement to review the environmental impact of the production and use of sustainable aviation fuel as defined by Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.30, subdivision 1, paragraph (g). new text end